Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.200

Administrative proceedings—Summary order—Notice—Hearing—Final order.

(1) The director shall commence an administrative proceeding under this chapter by entering either a statement of charges or a summary order. The statement of charges or summary order may be entered without notice, without opportunity for hearing, and need not be supported by findings of fact or conclusions of law, but must be in writing.

(2) Upon entry of the statement of charges or summary order, the director shall promptly inform all interested parties that they have twenty business days from receipt of notice of the statement of charges or the summary order to file a written request for a hearing on the matter with the director and that the hearing will be scheduled to commence within thirty business days after receipt of the written request.

(3) If no hearing is requested within the twenty-day period and none is ordered by the director, the statement of charges or summary order will automatically become a final order.

(4) If a hearing is requested or ordered, the director, after notice of and opportunity for hearing to all interested persons, may modify or vacate the order or extend it until final determination.

(5) No final order or order after hearing may be returned without:

(a) Appropriate notice to all interested persons;

(b) Opportunity for hearing by all interested persons; and

(c) Entry of written findings of fact and conclusions of law.

(6) Every hearing in an administrative proceeding under this chapter shall be public unless the director grants a request joined in by all the respondents that the hearing be conducted privately.

[ 1986 c 14 s 21.]